Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2504
Poisons; sale; false representation or use of fictitious name by purchaser, prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to give or sign a fictitious name or, in order to procure any poison, to make any false representation to the person from whom the same is procured; and it shall be unlawful for any person delivering any poison under the provision of section 71-2503 knowingly to make a fictitious, false or misleading entry in the Poison Register.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 564;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-628.